Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Administration

Cross references. —

As to ambulance business licenses, see chapter 36 of title 33.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 14 to 27; 9A Am. Jur. 2d Bankruptcy §§ 1310 to 1314.

§ 31-1-201.
General administrative procedures.

The department shall provide for the administration and enforcement of this act by its divisions. The department has supervisory jurisdiction over the levy and collection of fees and taxes levied by this act and shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act necessary to the enforcement of the fee and taxation provisions of this act.

The department shall adopt a seal for the use of the department or any division designated to enforce this act. The department and such employees of the department as it may designate shall prepare under the seal of the department or division and deliver upon request a certified copy of any public record of the department and may charge a reasonable fee therefor to be credited to the state general fund.

Officers and employees of the department designated by the department, county clerks and treasurers and their deputies and employees may administer oaths without fee for the purposes of this act.

The department shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, registration cards and all other forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this act subject to the requirements of this act and shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act necessary to the enforcement of the fee and taxation provisions of this act. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations permitting any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department including the payment of any fees and taxes to appeal to the office of administrative hearings pursuant to W.S.

9-2-2202

. The department shall provide, at cost, suitable certificate of title forms to county clerks.

The department, county clerks and treasurers shall examine and determine the genuineness, regularity and legality of every application submitted to them, may make such investigations of applications as may be deemed necessary or require additional information, and may reject any application if not satisfied of the genuineness, regularity, or legality thereof or the truth of any statement contained therein, or for any other reason when authorized by law.

The department may revoke any vehicle registration, certificate of title, or other authorization when the holder thereof commits fraud or knowingly provides false information on any application or in any process to obtain vehicle registration, certificate of title or other authorization, or is not entitled thereto or for violation of this act following notice and hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Following revocation any peace officer, department investigator or special enforcement officer designated by the director to do so upon request by the department shall seize and take possession of the registration card, certificate of title, dealer’s certificate, license plates or authorization and return the items to the department within five (5) business days.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2001, ch. 12, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, Laws 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2 and 4, deleted “subject to subsection (g) of this section” preceding “promulgate rules” in (a) and (d);
rewrote (f), which read: “The department may revoke any vehicle registration, certificate of title, or other authorization when the holder thereof is not entitled thereto or for violation of this act following notice and hearing. Following revocation any peace officer upon request shall seize and take possession of the registration card, certificate of title, dealer's certificate, license plates or authorization.”; and repealed former (g) pertaining to rules and regulations promulgated by the department establishing collection of fees and taxation.

Cross references. —

As to review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Applied

in

Drake v. State ex rel. Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 751 P.2d 1319,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 31-1-202.
Records.

County treasurers shall keep and maintain a permanent record of vehicle registrations. All applications and records other than the record of vehicle registrations may be destroyed by the treasurer after two (2) years from December 31 of each year.

County clerks shall keep and maintain a record in which all certificates of title shall be recorded at the time of issue and which is open to inspection by the public during reasonable office hours.

Within three (3) business days after issuance of a vehicle registration or certificate of title, county treasurers and county clerks shall forward a record thereof to the department. County treasurers shall notify the department and sheriff of his county of loss or mutilation of license plates.

The department shall maintain records of vehicle registrations from all counties indexed by distinctive vehicle numbers assigned by the department, the name of the registered owner and vehicle identification numbers. The department shall maintain a record of all vehicle certificates of title from all counties. Records are public and open to inspection by the public during reasonable office hours. The department shall maintain a vehicle identification number index of all vehicles for which certificates of title have been issued. Upon receipt of a notice of issuance of a certificate of title from any county clerk the department may destroy all records relating to former transfers of title to the vehicle and shall retain only the notice of issuance of the certificate of title in effect at any time. The department may annually compile and publish a list of all registered vehicles and supplements thereto which shall be furnished to Wyoming peace officers and the Wyoming office of homeland security without charge.

Records under this section shall be available to the public pursuant to current federal and state laws relative to the release of private information. Nothing in this section shall supersede federal law.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 2009, ch. 16, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties of county treasurers with respect to registration generally, see §

31-2-201

.

As to emergency management program, see §

19-13-105

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 2, deleted “and other applications submitted to and authorizations issued by them pursuant to this act” at the end of the first sentence of (a); substituted “record in which” for “record book in which a record of” in (b); in the first sentence of (c), substituted “three (3) business days” for “seventy-two (72) hours” and “record” for “copy”; substituted “Wyoming office of homeland security” for “state director of civil defense” near the end of (d); and added (e).

Central filing office. —

It might be well for the legislature to consider the advisability of amending this section so as to provide for a central office of record for the filing of certificates of title of motor vehicles and security interests thereon, or certified copies thereof. Slates v. Commercial Credit Corp., 412 P.2d 444,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1966) (decided prior to 1984 revision of this title).

§ 31-1-203.
Special enforcement officers; summons and notice to appear for violations; deposit for appearance; disposition of deposit.

The department shall designate certain employees as special officers for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of motor vehicle laws and regulations.

Employees designated under subsection (a) of this section may issue summons for violations of W.S.

31-4-101

,

31-7-106

,

31-7-133

,

31-18-101

through

31-18-603

,

31-18-701

,

31-18-801

through

31-18-808

and

39-17-208

.

The employees designated under subsection (a) of this section upon issuing a summons shall deliver to the offender a notice to appear which shall describe the nature of the offense, with instructions for the offender to report to the nearest circuit court designated in the notice. The employee may accept a deposit for appearance. The court coordinator shall establish a uniform deposit for appearance schedule for each violation of the statutes set forth in subsection (b) of this section. If the employee accepts a deposit for appearance from the offender, he shall give a signed, numbered receipt for the amount received and shall write the receipt number on the notice to appear. The employee shall deliver the deposit and a copy of the notice to appear to the circuit court before whom the offender is to appear and the circuit court judge shall give a receipt to the employee for the amount of the deposit. The circuit court shall assume jurisdiction after filing of a complaint and appearance by the offender. If the offender fails to appear at the appointed time the deposit for appearance may be forfeited by order of the court and paid into the public school fund of the county.

The department may enter into mutual aid agreements with adjoining states to provide for the construction and joint operation of ports-of-entry located near the borders of the party states. A mutual aid agreement pursuant to this subsection may provide for the issuance of permits and the collection of highway user fees, registration fees, permit fees, fuel taxes or any other motor carrier fees that may be prescribed by law at a joint port-of-entry on behalf of the adjoining state. As a condition precedent to a written agreement becoming effective under this act, the agreement shall be submitted to and receive the approval of the attorney general and the governor.

A mutual aid agreement pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall specify the following:

Its duration, which shall be not more than four (4) years;

The purpose of the agreement;

The manner of financing the agreement and establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;

The method to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;

Provision for administering the agreement;

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the agreement;

The minimum standards for port-of-entry employees implementing the provisions of the agreement;

The respective liability of each party to the agreement for the actions of port-of-entry employees when acting under the provisions of the agreement;

The minimum insurance, if any, required of each party to the agreement;

The exact chain of command or delegation of authority to be followed by port-of-entry employees acting under the provisions of the agreement;

The enforcement authority that the port-of-entry employee of each state may exercise;

Any other necessary and proper matters.

A special enforcement officer, appointed under subsection (a) of this section may receive an appointment from an adjoining state and act on behalf of the adjoining state to enforce commercial vehicle and size and weight laws at a joint port-of-entry, as provided in a mutual aid agreement pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. A special enforcement officer with an appointment from an adjoining state, upon determining there is probable cause to believe a person is in violation of the commercial vehicle or size and weight laws of the adjoining state, may issue a summons to appear in the appropriate state court of the adjoining state. The summons shall command the person to appear in the court of the adjoining state where the violations occurred. A special enforcement officer shall not have the power to arrest any person on behalf of an adjoining state.

The department may appoint an out-of-state special enforcement officer to issue summons as provided in subsection (b) of this section at a joint port-of-entry located in an adjoining state, pursuant to a mutual aid agreement as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

Whenever port-of-entry employees of an adjoining state are performing duties pursuant to a mutual aid agreement pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the employees shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as comparable Wyoming port-of-entry employees as provided for in the agreement.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; ch. 48, § 2; 2001, ch. 25, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2007, ch. 113, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; ch. 69, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement duties of state highway patrol, see §

24-12-102

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), deleted “justice of the peace or” preceding “circuit court” four times.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d) through (h).

The 2008 amendment.

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 44, § 1, deleted the former second sentence of (b) pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 69, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, in (b), inserted “and

39-17-208

” in the first sentence, and made a related change.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 31-1-204.
Transportation information system account.

There is created the transportation information system account into which shall be deposited funds as provided by law. Earnings from funds in the account shall be credited to the account. Funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the department of transportation and shall only be expended to replace the revenue information system that was in use on July 1, 2020. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

or

9-4-207

, unexpended funds in the account shall not revert without further action of the legislature.

The department of transportation may accept, and shall deposit in the transportation information system account, any gifts, contributions, donations, grants or federal funds designated for computer system modernization.

History.

2021 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 152, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.